Indiana, session 2026, HB1239.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-18-2-220.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 220.8. "Maximum contaminant
level", for purposes of IC 16-41-45, has the meaning set forth in
IC 16-41-45-1.
SECTION 2. IC 16-18-2-280.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 280.2. "PFAS", for purposes of
IC 16-41-45, has the meaning set forth in IC 16-41-45-2.
SECTION 3. IC 16-18-2-298.9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 298.9. "Public water system", for
purposes of IC 16-41-45, has the meaning set forth in
IC 16-41-45-3.
SECTION 4. IC 16-41-45 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
2026 IN 1239—LS 6566/DI 150


Chapter 45. Maximum Contaminant Level for PFAS in
Drinking Water
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "maximum contaminant level"
means the maximum permissible level of a contaminant in water
that is delivered to any user of a public water system.
Sec. 2. (a) As used in this chapter, "PFAS" refers to:
(1) perfluoroalkyl substances; and
(2) polyfluoroalkyl substances.
(b) The term includes perfluorooctanoic acid (PFOA),
perfluoroctanesulfonic acid (PFOS), fluoropolymers made without
the use of PFOA (including those with the trademark name Gen X),
and other manmade compounds that:
(1) were first commonly used in the 1950s and 1960s in
industrial processes and consumer products because they are
resistant to heat, water, and oil;
(2) are contained in nonstick cookware, grease resistant
paper, fast food wrappers, microwave popcorn bags, stain
resistant carpets and fabrics, water resistant clothing,
cleaning products, personal care products, polishes, waxes,
paints, and firefighting foams;
(3) are persistent in the environment and can accumulate in
the human body over time; and
(4) according to the United States Environmental Protection
Agency, have been determined in studies to cause:
(A) reproductive;
(B) developmental;
(C) liver;
(D) kidney; and
(E) immunological;
effects in laboratory animals.
Sec. 3. (a) As used in this chapter, "public water system" means
a system for the provision to the public of water for human
consumption through pipes or other constructed conveyances that:
(1) has at least fifteen (15) service connections; or
(2) regularly serves at least twenty-five (25) individuals.
(b) The term includes:
(1) any collection, treatment, storage, and distribution
facilities that are:
(A) under the control of the operator of a system described
in subsection (a); and
(B) used primarily in connection with a system described
in subsection (a); and
2026 IN 1239—LS 6566/DI 150


(2) any collection or pretreatment storage facilities that:
(A) are not under the control of the operator of a system
described in subsection (a); but
(B) are used primarily in connection with a system
described in subsection (a).
Sec. 4. (a) The state department shall adopt rules under
IC 4-22-2 establishing state maximum contaminant levels for PFAS
in water provided by public water systems.
(b) Maximum contaminant levels established under subsection
(a):
(1) must be protective of public health, including the health of
vulnerable subpopulations such as pregnant women, nursing
mothers, infants, and children; and
(2) may not be less stringent than any maximum contaminant
level or health advisory promulgated by the United States
Environmental Protection Agency.
2026 IN 1239—LS 6566/DI 150